Texas, session 891, HB78.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Subchapter I, Chapter 2306, Government Code, is amended by adding Section 2306.208 to read as follows: Sec. 2306.208.  HOUSING TEXAS FUND. (a) In this section, "fund" means the housing Texas fund. (b)  The housing Texas fund is created as a special fund in the state treasury. The Texas Department of Housing and Community Affairs shall administer the fund. (c)  The fund consists of: (1)  money appropriated to the board for a purpose of the fund; (2)  money the board transfers to the fund from any available source; (3)  depository interest allocable to the fund and other investment returns on money in the fund; (4)  money from gifts, grants, or donations to the fund; and (5)  any other fees or sources of revenue that the legislature may dedicate for deposit to the fund. (d)  Money in the fund may be used only as provided by this section. The department shall allocate annual expenditures from the fund as follows: (1)  90 percent shall be used to provide grants to nonprofit developers of multifamily affordable housing to develop, maintain, and manage rental housing for individuals and families of low income; (2)  nine percent shall be used to provide grants to nonprofit entities that have demonstrated proficiency, as established by department rule, in obtaining and maintaining stable housing placements for individuals and families who have recently experienced homelessness; and (3)  one percent shall be used to provide grants to nonprofit entities to be used as one-time expenditures to: (A)  prevent an individual or family from becoming homeless; or (B)  facilitate the ability of an individual or family experiencing homelessness to transition quickly into a stable housing placement. (e)  The department shall allocate grants under Subsection (d)(2) in a manner that prioritizes in descending order nonprofit entities that primarily provide services to: (1)  families with: (A)  a child under the age of 18; or (B)  a dependent with a disability; (2)  individuals recently released from prison or jail after serving a sentence of confinement; and (3)  adults who are experiencing homelessness and who do not have children. (f)  The department by rule shall provide for the manner in which the assets of the fund may be used, subject to the limitations provided by this section. SECTION 2.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.